Washington statutes.
RCW 33.43.010

Conversion of domestic association to federal association.

Any domestic association may convert itself into a federal mutual or stock savings and loan association. Any such conversion shall be effected by the vote of a majority in amount of the members present, in person or by proxy, at any regular or special meeting of the members called for such purpose. Notice of such meeting, stating the purpose thereof, shall be given the director at least thirty days prior to the meeting and to the members pursuant to the provisions contained in RCW 33.20.010.

If such conversion be authorized by the members at the meeting, the directors of the association are authorized and shall effect such action, and the officers of the association shall execute all proper conveyances, documents, and other papers necessary or proper thereunto.

If conversion be authorized, a copy of the minutes of the meeting shall be filed forthwith with the director.

Upon consummation of such conversion, the successor federal savings and loan association shall succeed to all right, title, and interest of the domestic association in and to its assets, and to its liabilities to the creditors and members of the association. Upon such conversion, after the execution and delivery of all instruments of transfer, conveyance and assignment, the domestic association shall be deemed dissolved.

[ 1994 c 92 s 466; 1982 c 3 s 74; 1949 c 20 s 10; 1945 c 235 s 116; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3717-235. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 15 ss 1 through 6. Formerly RCW 33.44.100.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.